en: soya flower
de: Sojablüte, Sojablüten
es: flor de soja
hr: cvijet soje
it: fiore di soia
nl: sojabloemen

en: soya bean, soy beans, soya beans, soybean, soybeans
am: ሻማ
ar: فول الصويا
as: চয়াবিন
be: соя культурная
bg: соеви зърна
bn: সয়াবিন
bo: སྲན་སེར།
ca: faves de soja
cs: sója luštinatá, sójové boby
da: sojabønne, sojabønner
de: Sojabohne, Sojabohnen, Sojakerne, Soja Bohnen
eo: sojfabo
es: granos de soja, haba de soja, haba de soya, habas de soja, habas de soya, semillas de soja, porotos de soja, porotos de soya
et: sojauba, sojaoad, karvane sojauba
fa: سویا
fi: soijapapu, soijapavut
fr: fève de soja, fèves de soja, soja entier, graine de soja, graines de soja, graines soja, grains de soja
ga: pónairí soighe, planda pónairí soighe
gu: સોયાબીન
ha: waken suya
he: פולי סויה, פול סויה
hi: सोयाबीन
hr: sojino zrno
hu: szójabab
hy: սոյա
id: kacang kedelai
is: sojabaun
it: semi di soia
ja: 大豆, だいず
kn: ಸೋಯಾ ಅವರೆ
ko: 콩
ku: fasulyeya soyayê
kw: faven soya
la: glycine max
lt: gauruotoji soja, sojų pupelės
lv: sojas pupas
ml: സോയാബീൻസ്
mn: шар буурцаг
mr: सोयबीन amit ामित
ms: kacang soya
mt: soybeans
my: ပဲပုပ်
nb: soyabønne
ne: भटमास
nl: sojaboon, sojabonen
nn: soyabønne
pa: ਸੋਇਆਬੀਨ
pl: soja warzywna, ziarna soi, ziaren soi, ziarno soi, nasiona soi
pt: grão de soja, grãos de soja
ro: boabe de soia
ru: соевые бобы, соя культурная
sa: सोयामाषः
sd: سويابين
si: සෝයා බෝංචි
sk: sója fazuľová, sójové bôby
sl: zrnje soje, navadna soja
su: kedelé
sv: sojaböna, sojabönor, sojaböns
ta: சோயா அவரை
te: సోయా చిక్కుడు
th: ถั่วเหลือง
tl: utaw
tt: кытай борчагы
ug: دادۇر
ur: سویا پھلی
vi: đậu tương
vo: soyabon
yi: סויע
za: duhhenj
zh: 大豆

en: green soy bean
de: Grünaäe Sojabohnen
fi: vihreä soijapapu
fr: soja vert
hr: zeleno sojino zrno
it: fagioli di soia verdi

en: black soy bean
de: Schwarze Sojabohnen
fr: soja noir
ja: 黒大豆

en: sprouted soybeans
de: Sojabohnensprossen
fr: germes de soja, pousses de soja
hr: proklijala soja
it: germogli di soia
nl: sojaspruiten
pl: kiełki soi

en: hulled soya bean
it: fagioli di soia decorticati

en: GMO-free hulled soya bean
fr: fèves de soja sans ogm décortiquées

en: black soy bean
de: Schwarze Sojabohnen
fr: soja noir
ja: 黒大豆

en: green soy bean
de: Grünaäe Sojabohnen
fi: vihreä soijapapu
fr: soja vert
hr: zeleno sojino zrno
it: fagioli di soia verdi

en: soya bean paste
de: Sojabohnenpaste
fr: Pâte de soja
hr: pasta od zrna soje
it: pasta di soia
pl: pasta sojowa

en: soy bran, soya bran
de: Sojakleie
es: salvado de soja
fi: soijaleseet
fr: son de soja
hr: sojine mekinje
it: crusca di soia

en: soya bean fiber
sv: sojabönfiber, sojabönfibrer

en: soy base, soya base
da: sojabase
de: sojabasis
es: zumo de soja, jugo de soja, zumo de soya, jugo de soya, base de soja
fi: soijapohja
fr: jus de soja
hr: baza soje
it: base di soia
ja: 大豆ベース
nl: sojabasis
pl: baza sojowa
sv: sojabas

en: Okara, soy pulp
cs: Okara
de: Okara
el: οκάρα
es: Pulpa de soya
fr: Pulpe de soja
hr: okara, Sojino meso
id: Okara
it: Polpa di soia
ja: おから
jv: Okara
ko: 비지
lt: Sojų išspaudos
nl: okara
pl: Okara
pt: Polpa de soja
ru: Окара
tr: Soya küspesi
uk: Соєва пульпа
vi: Bã đậu
zh: 豆渣

en: edamame, edamame bean, edamame beans, edamame soybeans
da: edamame bønner
de: Edamame Bohnen
fr: edamame, haricots edamame, fèves de soja edamame, edamame fèves, fève edamame
hr: edamame
hu: edamame szója, hámozott szójabab
it: edamame
ja: 枝豆, えだ豆, えだまめ
nl: edamamebonen, edamame

en: mukimame, shelled edamame
de: Mukimame, Edamame geschält
it: edamame sgusciati

en: gluten
ar: غلوتين
bg: глутен
ca: Gluten
cs: lepek
da: gluten
de: Gluten
el: γλουτένη
es: gluten
et: gluteen
fi: gluteeni
fr: gluten
ga: glútan
he: גלוטן
hr: gluten, glutena
hu: glutén, Glutent
it: glutine
ja: グルテン
lt: glitimas
lv: lipekli
mt: glutina
nb: gluten
nl: Gluten
pl: gluten
pt: glúten
ro: gluten
ru: глютен, клейковина пшеничная, глютен
sk: lepok, glutén
sl: gluten
sv: gluten
th: กลูเต็น
tr: glüten, gluten
uk: Глютен
zh: 麸质

en: barley gluten
bg: ечемичен глутен
de: Gerstengluten
hr: ječmeni gluten
it: glutine d'orzo, glutine (orzo), glutine orzo, glutine da orzo
nl: gerstgluten

en: wheat gluten
bg: пшеничен глутен
ca: gluten de blat
cs: pšeničný lepek
da: hvedegluten
de: Weizengluten, Weizenkleber
es: gluten de trigo
et: nisugluteen
fi: vehnägluteeni
fr: gluten de blé, gluten de froment
hr: pšeničnog glutena, pšenični gluten
hu: Búzaglutén
it: glutine di grano, glutine di frumento
lt: kviečių glitimas, kvietiniai glitimas, kvietinės glitimas, kvietinis glitimas
lv: kviešu lipeklis
nb: hvetegluten
nl: tarwegluten
pl: gluten pszenny
pt: glúten de trigo
ro: gluten de grâu, gluten din grâu
sk: pšeničny gluten
sl: pšenični gluten
sv: vetegluten

en: vital wheat gluten
fr: gluten vital de blé